Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Free Tuition and Fees for Spouse and Children of Certain Police, Fire, or Military Personnel.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, §§ 20-22.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, §§ 32-34.

Sec. 14.43.080.
Free tuition and fees at state-supported educational institutions. [Repealed, § 2 ch 50 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 14.43.085.
Free tuition and fees for a spouse or dependent of a peace officer or members of the armed services or a fire department.

A person enrolled as a student in good standing in a state supported educational institution in this state is entitled to a waiver of undergraduate tuition and fees if the person was the spouse or dependent child of a bona fide resident of the state who was

a member of the armed services and who died in the line of duty or who died as a result of injuries sustained while in the line of duty for the state or federal government or who was listed by the United States Department of Defense as a prisoner of war or as missing in action; or

a peace officer or a member of a fire department who died from an act arising out of and in the course of

employment as a peace officer or a firefighter; or

duties as a volunteer firefighter.

In this section,

“armed services” means the Alaska National Guard, Alaska Naval Militia, and the armed services of the United States;

“dependent child” means a person who was a dependent of a peace officer or of a member of the armed services or a fire department at the time of the peace officer’s or member’s death, and who is

the peace officer’s or member’s natural or adopted child;

a child in relation to whom the deceased armed services member, firefighter, or peace officer stood in loco parentis for at least three years before the peace officer’s or member’s death;

the peace officer’s or member’s stepchild; or

the peace officer’s or member’s acknowledged illegitimate child;

“fire department” means a federal, state, or municipal fire department or a regularly organized volunteer fire department registered with the state fire marshal;

“line of duty” has the meaning given under federal law;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

and includes a correctional officer;

“resident” means a person who resided in the state for at least one year before serving in the armed services and who lists Alaska as the home state for purposes of military records, or a person who was employed as a peace officer in this state or was a member of a fire department located in this state;

“spouse” means a person who was married to a peace officer or to a member of the armed services or a fire department at the time of the peace officer’s or member’s death.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1998)